Utah statutes.
67-4a-601.   Records retention.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), each holder required to file a
report under Part 3 shall maintain a record of the name and last-known address
of the owner for five years after the date the holder files the report.
(2)  Any business association that sells in this state its traveler's checks,
money orders, or other similar written instruments, other than third-party
bank checks on which the business association is directly liable, or that
provides such instruments to others for sale in this state, shall maintain a
record of those instruments while they remain outstanding, indicating the
state and date of issue for three years after the date the property is
reportable.
